Wyoming, session 2026, HB0133.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-16-120(a)(i) and by creating a new
subsection (b) is amended to read:

11-16-120. District supervisors; elections under
Election Code and for new districts.

HB0133

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0226
(a) District supervisors shall be elected in
subsequent elections under the Special District Elections
Act of 1994 and as hereinafter provided for new districts:

(i) At the first subsequent director election
following establishment of a new district, five (5)
supervisors, who reside within the district shall be
elected at large by a nonpartisan ballot. Three (3)
supervisors shall be rural residents, one (1) shall be a
resident of an urban area and one (1) shall be elected at
large. At the first subsequent director election, the at
large candidate receiving the largest number of votes shall
be elected for a four (4) year term, the urban candidate
receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected for
a four (4) year term, the rural candidate receiving the
largest number of votes shall serve a four (4) year term
and the two (2) candidates receiving the next highest
number of votes shall be elected for two (2) year terms.
Residency shall be determined at the time a supervisor is
elected and shall run for the length of the supervisor's
term. Not less than two (2) supervisors elected at large
shall reside in a rural area located in the district and
shall be directly participating in production agriculture.
HB0133

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0226
The other supervisors shall be elected at large. Candidates
shall designate if they are running for a production
agriculture position or general position. In succeeding
elections all supervisors shall be elected for four (4)
year terms.

(b) For purposes of this section, "production
agriculture" means any owner, operator or tenant of a farm
or ranch used to produce food, fiber, crops or livestock,
for commercial purposes, including animal husbandry.

Section 2. This act shall apply to elected
conservation district supervisors whose terms commence on
or after the effective date of this act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0133